North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-05 Podiatrists
43-05-16.8.
Loan for litigation expenses.

Subject to approval by the emergency commission, the board may borrow funds sufficient to pay for attorney’s fees and costs incurred in investigations, administrative proceedings, and litigation resulting from the board performing its duties. Notwithstanding section 43-05-15, the board may establish an annual renewal license fee for each year following the issuance of a loan under this section, and the fee must be maintained until the loan is fully repaid, including any accrued interest. The amount of the annual renewal license fee assessed under this section may not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars. Once the loan is paid in full, the annual renewal license fee must revert to the amount established by the board before the issuance of the loan. The notice of a proposed rule to assess the fee in this section or revert to the previous license fee may be sent by certified mail to each individual licensed by the board in lieu of the publication requirements for the notice in chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 365, § 1; 2015, ch. 287, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

43-05-17.
Penalty.

A person violating any provision of this chapter for which another penalty is not provided is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. In addition, the civil remedy of injunction is available to the board to restrain and enjoin any violation of this chapter without the need to prove actual damages to any person.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 95, § 16; R.C. 1943, § 43-0517; S.L. 1975, ch. 396, § 11; 1991, ch. 450, § 20.

Cross-References

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. §

12.1-32-01.